Hawaii, session 2026, HB487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that eliminating redundant or outdated regulations would improve government efficiency.  Research from the Mercatus Center at George Mason University estimated that the Code of Hawaii Rules has 108,741 restrictions and 6,438,101 words.  Several states have streamlined regulations using an artificial intelligence (AI) tool. For example, Ohio has been using AI text analytics to identify and eliminate outdated and unnecessary administrative codes.  South Carolina has taken similar steps to scale back regulations.  The legislature finds that, in order to most efficiently and cost-effectively reduce regulatory redundancy, it is important for the State to leverage modern tools such as AI to comb through the vast volume of state laws and regulations and eliminate regulatory obstacles. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Provide funds to the legislative reference bureau to utilize an AI tool to analyze the Hawaii Revised Statutes and Hawaii Administrative Rules and identify provisions that are obsolete, duplicative, or inconsistent with statute or other regulations; and (2)  Require the legislative reference bureau to report to the legislature its findings and recommendations. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $         or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for procurement of artificial intelligence software and analytic services to analyze the Hawaii Revised Statutes and Hawaii Administrative Rules and identify provisions that are obsolete, duplicative, or inconsistent with statute or other regulations. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the legislative reference bureau for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  The legislative reference bureau shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________